Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF849.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1084HV (1) 91 as/js H.F. 849 Section 1. Section 708.7, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. A person commits harassment when 3 the person purposefully and without legitimate purpose 4 disseminates, publishes, distributes, or posts personal 5 information about another person, without the other personâs 6 consent, with the intent to threaten, intimidate, annoy, or 7 alarm the other person, or with the intent to encourage or 8 entice third parties to threaten, intimidate, annoy, or alarm 9 the other person. 10 Sec. 2. Section 708.7, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2025, 11 is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 12 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (5) A violation of subsection 1, 13 paragraph âcâ . 14 Sec. 3. Section 708.7, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 15 by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. âPersonal informationâ means a personâs 17 contact information or the contact information of the personâs 18 family, including but not limited to the personâs or familyâs 19 home address, phone number, email address, social media 20 profile, place of employment, photographic or film depictions 21 of the person or the personâs family, or any other information 22 designed to allow other persons to threaten, intimidate, annoy, 23 or alarm the other person or personâs family. 24